Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-138.02
Contracts; not valid encumbrances; exception.

Contracts, other than a purchase order, for goods or services to be provided in a subsequent biennium do not represent valid encumbrances of current biennium appropriations and will require specific reappropriation by the Legislature. Only that portion of a contract which meets the criteria established in subdivision (2) of section 81-138.01 may be encumbered.

Laws 1979, LB 233, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 258, § 28.